lt-LT: Blokavimo vielos naudojimas: Nėrinių blokavimui; Servetėlių / takelių blokavimui; Drabužių formavimui; Bendros paskirties blokavimui; Mezginių blokavimui; Nėrinių (raštuotų) blokavimui; Kita
cs: Účel použití blokovacího drátu: Vypínání háčkování; Vypínání deček/běhounů; Tvarování oděvů; Univerzální vypínání; Vypínání pletenin; Vypínání krajek; Jiné
nl: Blokdraad gebruik: Haakwerk opspannen; Kleedjes/tafellopers opspannen; Kledingstukken in vorm brengen; Algemeen opspannen; Breiwerk opspannen; Kant opspannen; Anders
ro-RO: Utilizarea firelor pentru întindere: Blocare croșetate; Blocare mileuri/traverse; Modelare haine; Blocare universală; Blocare tricotaje; Blocare dantelă; Altele
th: การใช้ลวดสำหรับบล็อกงาน: บล็อกกิ้งงานถักโครเชต์; บล็อกกิ้งผ้าปู/ผ้ารองตกแต่ง; การจัดทรงเสื้อผ้า; บล็อกกิ้งอเนกประสงค์; บล็อกกิ้งงานถักนิตติ้ง; บล็อกกิ้งผ้าลูกไม้; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Uporaba napenjalne žice: Napenjanje kvačkanin; Napenjanje prtičkov/tekačev; Oblikovanje oblačil; Splošno napenjanje; Napenjanje pletenin; Napenjanje čipk; Drugo
pt-BR: Uso dos fios de bloqueio/blocagem: Blocagem de crochê; Blocagem de toalhinhas/caminhos de mesa; Modelagem de roupas; Blocagem de uso geral; Blocagem de tricô; Blocagem de renda; Outro
ja: ブロッキングワイヤーの用途: クロシェブロッキング; ドイリー / ランナーブロッキング; 衣服のシェーピング; 汎用ブロッキング; ニットウェアブロッキング; レースブロッキング; その他
es: Uso de cables de bloqueo: Bloqueo de croché; Bloqueo de tapetes/caminos de mesa; Moldeado de prendas; Bloqueo de uso general; Bloqueo de prendas de punto; Bloqueo de encaje; Otro
fr: Usage du fil de blocage: Blocage de crochet; Blocage de napperons/chemins de table; Mise en forme de vêtements; Blocage tout usage; Blocage de tricots; Blocage de dentelle; Autre
ru: Использование блокирующей проволоки: Блокировка вязания крючком; Блокировка салфеток/дорожек; Формование одежды; Универсальная блокировка; Блокировка трикотажа; Блокировка кружев; Другое
pt-PT: Utilização do fio de bloqueio: Bloqueio de croché; Bloqueio de naperon/caminho de mesa; Modelação de peças de vestuário; Bloqueio de uso geral; Bloqueio de malhas; Bloqueio de rendas; Outros
tr: Bloklama teli kullanım amacı: Tığ işi bloklama; Dantel/masa örtüsü bloklama; Giysi şekillendirme; Genel amaçlı bloklama; Örgü bloklama; Dantel örgü bloklama; Diğer
ko: 블로킹 와이어 용도: 코바늘 블로킹; 도일리/러너 블로킹; 의류 쉐이핑; 다목적 블로킹; 니트웨어 블로킹; 레이스 블로킹; 기타
zh-TW: 定型鋼絲用途: 鉤織定型; 桌巾/桌巾條定型; 服裝塑形; 一般用途定型; 針織衫定型; 蕾絲定型; 其他
sv: Användning av blockeringstrådar: Virkblockning; Blockning av duk/löpare; Formning av plagg; Allmän blockning; Stickblockning; Spetsblockning; Övrigt
de: Verwendungszweck des Blocking-Drahts: Häkelarbeiten spannen; Deckchen/Läufer spannen; Kleidungsstücke formen; Allzweck-Spannen; Strickwaren spannen; Spitze spannen; Sonstige
it: Blocco dell'utilizzo dei cavi: Messa in forma dell’uncinetto; Messa in forma di centrini/runner; Sagomatura di capi d’abbigliamento; Messa in forma multiuso; Messa in forma della maglieria; Messa in forma del pizzo; Altro
fi: Pingotuslangan käyttö: Virkkaustöiden pingotus; Pitsiliinojen/kaitaliinojen pingotus; Vaatteiden muotoilu; Yleinen pingotus; Neuleiden pingotus; Pitsin pingotus; Muu
hu: Blokkoló huzal felhasználása: Horgolás blokkolása; Terítők / futók blokkolása; Ruhadarabok formázása; Általános célú blokkolás; Kötöttáru blokkolása; Csipke blokkolása; Egyéb
hr-HR: Blokiranje korištenja žice: Blokiranje kukičanih radova; Blokiranje tabletića/nadstolnjaka; Oblikovanje odjeće; Blokiranje opće namjene; Blokiranje pletiva; Blokiranje čipke; Ostalo
vi: Công dụng của dây định hình: Định hình len móc; Định hình khăn trải/khăn lót; Định hình quần áo; Định hình đa năng; Định hình đồ đan; Định hình vải ren; Khác
bg-BG: Предназначение на блокиращия проводник: Блокиране на плетива на една кука; Блокиране на покривки/тишлайфери; Оформяне на облекла; Блокиране с общо предназначение; Блокиране на плетива; Блокиране на дантела; Други
el: Χρήση σύρματος μπλοκαρίσματος: Τέντωμα πλεκτού (κροσέ); Τέντωμα σεμεδάκι/ράνερ; Διαμόρφωση ρούχου; Τέντωμα γενικής χρήσης; Τέντωμα πλεκτών (με βελόνες); Τέντωμα δαντέλας; Άλλο
en: Blocking wire usage: Crochet blocking; Doily/runner blocking; Garment shaping; General-purpose blocking; Knitwear blocking; Lace blocking; Other
pl: Zastosowanie drutu blokującego: Blokowanie szydełkowe; Blokowanie serwetek/bieżników; Nadawanie kształtu odzieży; Blokowanie ogólnego przeznaczenia; Blokowanie dzianin; Blokowanie koronek; Inne
zh-CN: 定型丝使用: 钩针编织定型; 桌垫/桌旗定型; 服装塑形; 通用定型; 针织品定型; 蕾丝定型; 其他
nb: Blokkering av ledningsbruk: Hekleblokkering; Blokkering av brikker/løpere; Forming av plagg; Generell blokkering; Strikkeblokkering; Blondeblokkering; Annet
da: Blokledningsbrug: Opspænding af hækling; Opspænding af mellemlægsserviet/løber; Formning af tøj; Universal-opspænding; Opspænding af strik; Opspænding af blonder; Andet
sk-SK: Použitie blokovacieho drôtu: Napínanie háčkovania; Napínanie obrúskov/behúňov; Tvarovanie odevov; Viacúčelové napínanie; Napínanie pletenín; Napínanie čipiek; Iné